Indiana, session 2026, SB201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-9-2-42, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 42. (a) "Domestic or family violence" means,
except for an act of self-defense, the occurrence of one (1) or more of
the following acts committed by a family or household member:
(1) Attempting to cause, threatening to cause, or causing physical
harm to another family or household member without legal
justification.
(2) Placing a family or household member in fear of physical
harm without legal justification.
(3) Causing a family or household member to involuntarily
engage in sexual activity by force, threat of force, or duress.
(4) Abusing (as described in IC 35-46-3-0.5), torturing (as
described in IC 35-46-3-0.5), mutilating (as described in
IC 35-46-3-0.5), or killing a vertebrate animal without
justification with the intent to threaten, intimidate, coerce, harass,
or terrorize a family or household member.
2026 IN 201—LS 6853/DI 148


For purposes of IC 22-4-15-1 and IC 34-26-5, domestic or family
violence also includes stalking (as defined in IC 35-45-10-1) or a sex
offense under IC 35-42-4, whether or not the stalking or sex offense is
committed by a family or household member.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) Verbal, emotional, economic, litigious, or psychological
abuse.
(2) Isolation.
(3) Threats, including threats to seek child custody or joint
custody as a means to coerce an individual to return or punish
an individual for leaving.
(4) Controlling behavior.
(5) Monitoring.
(6) Stalking (as defined in IC 35-45-10-1).
(7) A sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2).
SECTION 2. IC 31-34-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.179-2025,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (d), the juvenile
court shall release the child to the child's parent, guardian, or custodian.
However, the court may order the child detained if the court makes
written findings of fact upon the record of probable cause to believe
that the child is a child in need of services and that any of the following
factors applies:
(1) Detention is necessary to protect the child.
(2) The child is unlikely to appear before the juvenile court for
subsequent proceedings.
(3) The child has a reasonable basis for requesting that the child
not be released.
(4) The parent, guardian, or custodian:
(A) cannot be located; or
(B) is unable or unwilling to take custody of the child.
(5) Consideration for the safety of the child precludes the use of
family services to prevent removal of the child. In considering this
factor, the court shall:
(A) give great weight to evidence:
(i) of the presence in the child's residence of; or
(ii) that the child has been exposed to;
a fentanyl containing substance or fentanyl related substance
for which the child's parent, guardian, or custodian does not
have a valid prescription; and
(B) evaluate whether the evidence described in clause (A)(i)
or (A)(ii) necessitates removal in consideration of the
2026 IN 201—LS 6853/DI 148


following factors:
(i) The age of the child.
(ii) Whether the child is particularly vulnerable to the
harmful effects of the fentanyl containing substance or
fentanyl related substance due to the child's medical or
developmental condition.
(iii) The risk of the child accidentally ingesting the fentanyl
containing substance or fentanyl related substance.
(b) The juvenile court shall include in any order approving or
requiring detention of a child all findings and conclusions required
under:
(1) applicable provisions of Title IV-E of the federal Social
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 670 et seq.); or
(2) any applicable federal regulation, including 45 CFR 1356.21;
as a condition of eligibility of a child in need of services for assistance
under Title IV-E or any other federal law.
(c) Inclusion in a juvenile court order of language approved and
recommended by the judicial conference of Indiana, in relation to:
(1) removal from the child's home; or
(2) detention;
of a child who is alleged to be, or adjudicated as, a child in need of
services constitutes compliance with subsection (b).
(d) Unless the juvenile court orders appropriate conditions
under section 3.5 of this chapter to ensure the child's safety after
being released, the juvenile court may not release a child who is
alleged to be, or adjudicated as, a child in need of services under:
(1) IC 31-34-1-1;
(2) IC 31-34-1-2;
(3) IC 31-34-1-3;
(4) IC 31-34-1-3.5;
(5) IC 31-34-1-4; or
(6) IC 31-34-1-5;
to the child's parent, guardian, or custodian.
SECTION 3. IC 33-24-6-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The office shall develop and implement an
ongoing education and training program for the following persons:
(1) A judge.
(2) A magistrate.
(3) Any other court personnel, including:
(A) a guardian ad litem;
(B) a court appointed special advocate; and
2026 IN 201—LS 6853/DI 148


(C) a master or mediator.
(b) A program developed under subsection (a) must satisfy all
of the following:
(1) Relate to child abuse and domestic or family violence,
including:
(A) sexual abuse;
(B) physical abuse;
(C) emotional abuse;
(D) implicit and explicit bias; and
(E) trauma and neglect and the impact of child abuse and
domestic violence on children.
(2) Identify the latest best practices for evidence based and
peer reviewed research by recognized experts in the types of
abuse designated under subdivision (1).
(3) Be designed to improve the ability of the court:
(A) to recognize and respond to the impact of child abuse,
domestic or family violence, and trauma on all victims,
specifically children; and
(B) to make appropriate custody decisions that are in the
best interest of the child.
SECTION 4. IC 35-31.5-2-76, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2016,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 76. "Crime involving domestic or family violence"
means a crime that occurs when a family or household member
commits, attempts to commit, or conspires to commit any of the
following against another family or household member:
(1) A homicide offense under IC 35-42-1.
(2) A battery offense under IC 35-42-2.
(3) Kidnapping or confinement under IC 35-42-3.
(4) Human and sexual trafficking crimes under IC 35-42-3.5.
(5) A sex offense under IC 35-42-4. (as defined in
IC 11-8-8-5.2).
(6) Robbery under IC 35-42-5.
(7) Arson or mischief under IC 35-43-1.
(8) Burglary or trespass under IC 35-43-2.
(9) Disorderly conduct under IC 35-45-1.
(10) Intimidation or harassment under IC 35-45-2.
(11) Voyeurism under IC 35-45-4.
(12) Stalking under IC 35-45-10.
(13) An offense against family under IC 35-46-1-2 through
IC 35-46-1-8, IC 35-46-1-12, IC 35-46-1-15.1, or
IC 35-46-1-15.3.
2026 IN 201—LS 6853/DI 148


(14) A crime involving animal cruelty and a family or household
member under IC 35-46-3-12(b)(2) or IC 35-46-3-12.5.
2026 IN 201—LS 6853/DI 148